Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-501
County buildings; erection; petition.

Whenever it is deemed necessary to erect a courthouse, jail, or other public county buildings in any county in this state, the county board may and, upon petition of not less than one-fourth of the registered voters of the county as shown by the list of registered voters of the last previous general election, shall submit to the people of the county to be voted upon at a general election or at a special election called by the county board for that purpose a proposition to vote a special annual tax for that purpose of not to exceed three and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all the taxable property in such county for a term of not to exceed five years. The special annual tax is excluded from the limitation in section 77-3442 as provided by section 77-3444.

Laws 1895, c. 27, § 1, p. 129;

Laws 1897, c. 22, § 1, p. 187;

Laws 1909, c. 31, § 1, p. 213;

R.S.1913, § 436;

C.S.1922, § 353;

C.S.1929, § 11-701;

R.S.1943, § 23-501;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 47, p. 958;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 120;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 104;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 7;

Laws 1999, LB 141, § 5.

Authority to borrow money for the purpose of building a courthouse must be conferred by a vote of the electors. Lewis v. Board of County Commissioners of Sherman County, 5 F. 269 (Cir. Ct., D. Neb. 1881).